Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 275 Limited Liability Companies

275.001.
Short title for chapter.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 93, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Woodford, The Ethical Implications of the Limited Liability Status in the Practice of Law, 87 Ky. L.J. 489 (1998-99).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

ALR

Construction and application of limited liability company acts, 79 A.L.R.5th 689.

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts — Issues Relating to Formation of Limited Liability Company and Addition or Disassociation of Members Thereto, 43 A.L.R.6th 611.

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts — Issues Relating to Liability of Limited Liability Company for Acts of Its Members, Managers, Officers, and Agents, 46 A.L.R.6th 1.

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts — Issues Relating to Personal Liability of Individual Members and Managers of Limited Liability Company as to Third Parties, 47 A.L.R.6th 1.

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts — Issues Relating to Derivative Actions and Actions Between Members of Limited Liability Company, 48 A.L.R.6th 1.

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts — Issues Relating to Dissolution and Winding Up of Affairs of Limited Liability Company, 49 A.L.R.6th 1.

Issues Concerning Bankruptcy Proceedings of Limited Liability Companies, 37 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 129.

275.003.
Construction of chapter.

It shall be the policy of the General Assembly through this chapter to give maximum effect to the principles of freedom of contract and the enforceability of operating agreements. Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity shall supplement this chapter. Although this chapter is in derogation of common law, the rules of construction that require strict construction of statutes which are in derogation of common law shall not apply to its provisions. This chapter shall not be construed to impair the obligations of any contract existing when this chapter, or any amendment of it, becomes effective, nor to affect any action or proceeding begun or right accrued before the chapter or amendment takes effect.

A written operating agreement may provide that the limited liability company interest of any member who fails to make any contribution that the member is obligated to make or who otherwise violates an obligation undertaken in the operating agreement shall be subject to specified penalties for, or specified consequences, such failure. Such penalty or consequence may take the form of:

Reducing or eliminating the defaulting member’s proportionate interest in the limited liability company;

Subordinating the member’s interest to that of nondefaulting members;

A forced sale of that limited liability company interest;

Forfeiture of his or her limited liability company interest;

The lending by other members of the amount necessary to meet the defaulting member’s commitment;

A fixing of the value of his or her limited liability company interest by appraisal or by formula and redemption or sale of the limited liability company interest at such; or

Other penalty or consequence.

A written operating agreement may provide rights to any person, including a person who is not a member or not otherwise a party to the operating agreement, to the extent set forth therein.

Except to the extent set forth in a written operating agreement, a limited liability company is bound by and a party to the operating agreement.

Action validly taken pursuant to one (1) provision of this chapter shall not be deemed invalid solely because it is identical or similar in substance to an action that could have been taken pursuant to some other provision of this chapter but fails to satisfy one (1) or more requirements prescribed by such other provision.

No member or other person shall have a vested property right resulting from any provision of the operating agreement which may not be modified by its amendment or as otherwise permitted by law.

Each member and manager and any other party to an operating agreement shall discharge all duties and exercise all rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing. The obligation of good faith and fair dealing may not be eliminated in the operating agreement, but it may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured provided the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

To the extent the articles of organization and the operating agreement do not otherwise provide, the Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act shall govern relations among the limited liability company, the members, the managers, and the assignees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 92, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 133, § 28, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 104, effective July 12, 2012.

275.005.
Purpose of limited liability company.

A limited liability company may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose, including the provision of one (1) or more professional services conducted in or outside the Commonwealth. Except as otherwise provided in KRS

275.150

, if the purpose for which a limited liability company is organized or its activities make it subject to one (1) or more special provisions of law, the limited liability company shall also comply with those provisions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.010.
Powers of limited liability companies.

Except as otherwise set forth in this chapter or unless the articles of organization or operating agreement provide otherwise, every limited liability company shall have the powers to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs.

A limited liability company is a legal entity distinct from its members.

Professional limited liability companies shall be governed by the laws, whether statutory or common law, applicable to other limited liability companies. Except for those provisions concerning the personal liability of members, managers, employees, and agents of a limited liability company, nothing in this chapter shall restrict, limit, or expand in any manner the authority and duty of any regulating board to:

License individual persons providing professional services; and

Regulate the practice of persons providing professional services which are within the jurisdiction of the regulating board, even though the persons are members, managers, employees, or agents of a professional limited liability company, or provide professional services through a professional limited liability company, including the establishment of regulations concerning:

The qualifications of members or managers of a professional limited liability company;

The transfer of limited liability company interests in a professional limited liability company; or

The provision of one (1) or more professional services through a professional limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
2, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
92, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 92, effective July 15, 2010.

275.015.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Articles of organization” means the articles filed in conformity with the provisions of KRS

275.020

and

275.025

, and those articles as amended or restated;

“Business entity” means a domestic or foreign limited liability company, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, business or statutory trust, and not-for-profit unincorporated association;

“Corporation” means a profit or nonprofit corporation formed under the laws of any state or a foreign country;

“Court” means every court having jurisdiction in the case;

“Deliver” or “delivery” means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and electronic transmission;

“Dissent” means a right to object to a proposed action or transaction and, in connection therewith, to demand a redemption of a limited liability company interest;

“Electronic transmission” or “electronically transmitted” means any process of communication not directly involving the physical transfer of paper that is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient;

“Event of disassociation” means an event that causes a person to cease to be a member as provided in KRS

275.280

;

“Foreign limited liability company” means an organization that is:

An unincorporated association;

Organized under laws of a state other than the laws of this Commonwealth, or under the laws of any foreign country; and

Organized under a statute pursuant to which an association may be formed that affords to each of its members limited liability with respect to the liabilities of the entity;

“Foreign nonprofit corporation” means a corporation incorporated for a nonprofit purpose under the laws of a state other than the Commonwealth or under the laws of a foreign country;

“Knowledge” means actual knowledge of a fact;

“Limited liability company” or “domestic limited liability company” means a limited liability company formed under this chapter and, except with respect to a nonprofit limited liability company, having one (1) or more members;

“Limited liability company interest” or “interest in the limited liability company” means the interest that may be issued in accordance with KRS

275.195

;

“Limited partnership” means a limited partnership formed under the laws of the Commonwealth or any other state or a foreign country;

“Majority-in-interest of the members” means those members entitled to cast a majority of the votes to be cast by the members on any matter under the terms of the operating agreement described in KRS 275.175(3);

“Manager” or “managers” means, with respect to a limited liability company that has set forth in its articles of organization that it is to be managed by managers, the person or persons designated in accordance with KRS

275.165

;

“Member” or “members” means a person or persons who have been admitted to membership in a limited liability company as provided in KRS

275.275

and who have not ceased to be members as provided in KRS 275. 172 or

275.280

;

“Name of record with the Secretary of State” means any real, fictitious, reserved, registered, or assumed name of a business entity;

“Nonprofit limited liability company” means a limited liability company formed for a nonprofit purpose having one (1) or more or no members that has elected in its articles of organization to be treated as a nonprofit limited liability company in accordance with KRS 275.025(6);

“Nonprofit purpose” includes any purpose authorized under KRS

273.167

;

“Operating agreement” means any agreement, written or oral, among all of the members, as to the conduct of the business and affairs of a limited liability company. If a limited liability company has only one (1) member, an operating agreement shall be deemed to include:

A writing executed by the member that relates to the affairs of the limited liability company and the conduct of its business regardless of whether the writing constitutes an agreement; or

If the limited liability company is managed by a manager, any other agreement between the member and the limited liability company as it relates to the limited liability company and the conduct of its business, regardless of whether the agreement is in writing;

“Person” means an individual, a partnership, a domestic or foreign limited liability company, a trust, an estate, an association, a corporation, or any other legal entity;

“Principal office” means the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, so designated in writing with the Secretary of State where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign limited liability company are located;

“Proceeding” means civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigative action;

“Professional limited liability company” means a limited liability company organized under this chapter or the laws of another state or foreign country for purposes that include, but are not limited to, the providing of one (1) or more professional services. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, all provisions of this chapter governing limited liability companies shall be applicable to professional limited liability companies;

“Professional services” mean the personal services rendered by physicians, osteopaths, optometrists, podiatrists, chiropractors, dentists, nurses, pharmacists, psychologists, occupational therapists, veterinarians, engineers, architects, landscape architects, certified public accountants, public accountants, physical therapists, and attorneys;

“Real name” shall have the meaning set forth in KRS

365.015

;

“Regulating board” means the governmental agency which is charged by law with the licensing and regulation of the practice of the profession which the professional limited liability company is organized to provide; and

“State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
21, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 149, §
232, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 137, §
93, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 93, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 34, § 45, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 193, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

275.020.
Procedure for forming limited liability company.

One (1) or more persons may serve as the organizer and form a limited liability company by delivering articles of organization to the Secretary of State for filing. It shall not be necessary that the person or persons be members of the limited liability company.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the existence of the limited liability company shall begin when the articles of organization are filed by the Secretary of State. If a delayed effective date is specified, the existence of the limited liability company shall begin when the articles of organization are effective as specified in KRS

14A.2-070

.

The Secretary of State’s filing of the articles of organization shall be conclusive proof that the organizer or organizers satisfied all conditions precedent to organization, except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the organization or involuntarily dissolve the limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
22, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
94, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 94, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 141, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.025.
Contents of articles of organization.

The articles of organization shall set forth:

A name for the limited liability company that satisfies the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

;

The registered office and initial registered agent that satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.4-010

;

The mailing address of the initial principal office of the limited liability company; and

A statement that the limited liability company is to be managed by a manager or managers or that the limited liability company is to be managed by its members.

The term of a limited liability company shall be perpetual unless a period of duration other than perpetual is set forth in the articles of organization.

The articles of organization of a professional limited liability company shall designate the professional services to be practiced through the professional limited liability company.

The articles of organization may set forth any other matter that under this chapter is permitted to be set forth in an operating agreement not inconsistent with law.

A member of a limited liability company shall not have a vested property right resulting from any provision of the articles of organization.

If the limited liability company is a nonprofit limited liability company, then the articles of organization shall state that fact and its nonprofit purpose. This provision of the articles of organization shall not be removed from the articles of organization without written notice to the Attorney General of Kentucky given not less than ten (10) business days prior to the filing of the amendment.

The fact that the articles of organization are on file with the Secretary of State is notice:

That the limited liability company formed by the filing of the articles of organization is a limited liability company formed under the laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and

Of all other facts set forth in the articles of organization which are required to be set forth by subsections (1), (3), and (6) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
23, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
95, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 95, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 71, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 29, § 13, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/8/2011). 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 24, provides that the amendments to this section in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 13, are retroactive to January 1, 2011.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Fassler and Lavelle, Taxation Of Kentucky Limited Liability Companies, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 41.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The Lost Distinction Between Agency and Decisional Authority: Unfortunate Consequences of the Member-Managed versus Manager-Managed Distinction in the Limited Liability Company.,
93 Ky. L.J. 737 (2004/2005).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.030.
Amendment of articles of organization.

A limited liability company shall amend its articles of organization to add or change a provision that is required by this chapter to be included in the articles of organization. A limited liability company may amend its articles of organization to add, change, or delete a provision that is permitted to be or that is not required to be in the articles of organization. The articles of organization shall be amended if:

There is a change in the name of the limited liability company;

There is a change in the latest date upon which the limited liability company is to dissolve;

There is a change in whether the management of the limited liability company is vested in managers or members; or

There is a change in any other matter required to be set forth in the articles of organization under KRS

275.025

.

Amendment of the articles of organization to change the mailing address of the principal office of the limited liability company shall be done as provided in KRS

275.040

, and a change to the registered office or the registered agent shall be done as provided in KRS

14A.4-020

.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, or unless the articles of organization or the operating agreement provide otherwise, an amendment to the articles of organization of a limited liability company shall be approved by the members in accordance with KRS

275.175

.

Unless the articles of organization or the written operating agreement provide otherwise, a manager or, if there is no manager, any member may amend the articles of organization of the limited liability company without action by the members to delete:

The name and address of the initial registered agent or initial registered office if a statement of change pursuant to KRS

14A.4-020

or predecessor law is on file with the Secretary of State; or

The mailing address of the initial principal office, if a statement of change pursuant to KRS

14A.5-010

or predecessor law is on file with the Secretary of State.

To amend its articles of organization, a limited liability company shall file with the Secretary of State articles of amendment that satisfy KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

setting forth:

The name of the limited liability company;

The text of each amendment adopted;

The date of each amendment’s adoption; and

A statement that the amendment was duly adopted by the managers or the members in accordance with the articles of organization, the operating agreement of the limited liability company, or this chapter.

The articles of organization may be amended in any respect as may be desired, if the articles of organization as amended contain only provisions that may be lawfully contained in articles of organization at the time of making the amendment.

Unless the articles of organization provide otherwise, no member of a limited liability company shall have the right to dissent from an amendment to the articles of organization.

A professional limited liability company that has ceased to be utilized for rendering a professional service may by amendment of its articles of organization delete the provisions required by KRS 275.025(3) and adopt a name conforming to KRS

275.100

, whereupon the limited liability company shall no longer be a professional limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
6, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
96, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 96, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 29, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 72, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). In subsection (1) of this statute, “KRS

275.120

” has been changed to “KRS

14A.4-020

” in codification. The original citation was added through amendment by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, effective 7/15/2010, but the cited statute was repealed as part of the omnibus Kentucky Business Entity Filing Act, 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. The correct citation, consistent with an identical change made to subsection 3(a) of this section by the Kentucky Business Entity Filing Act, has been substituted by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 133 and 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendments, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together.

275.035.
Restatement of articles of organization.

A limited liability company may restate its articles of organization by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the limited liability company and the text of the restated articles of organization together with a certificate stating whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles of organization requiring member approval and, if it does, setting forth the information required by KRS 275.030(4).

Restated articles of organization shall supersede the original articles of organization and all amendments to them when the restated articles of organization become effective pursuant to KRS

14A.2-070

.

The Secretary of State may certify restated articles of organization as the articles of organization currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 151, § 142, effective January 1, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.040.
Statement of change of mailing address.

A limited liability company that changes the mailing address of its principal place of business shall comply with KRS

14A.5-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
8, effective July 15, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 73, effective January 1, 2011.

275.045.
Requirements for documents to be filed with the Secretary of State.

Each document delivered by a domestic or foreign limited liability company to the Secretary of State for filing shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
9, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
97, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
97, effective July 15, 2010; ch. 151, § 74, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

275.050.
Prescribed forms. [Repealed.]

275.055.
Fees for filing documents with Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this section are delivered to him for filing:

Articles of organization $40.00 (2) Amendment of article of organization $40.00 (3) Restatement of articles of organization $40.00 (4) Amendment and restatement of articles of organization $80.00 (5) Articles of dissolution with respect to a domestic limited liability company $40.00 (6) Articles of merger $50.00 (7) Articles of correction $20.00 (8) Articles of share exchange $50.00 (9) Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this chapter $15.00

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
11, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
99, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
99, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 75, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

275.060.
Effective date and time of document. [Repealed.]

275.065.
Articles of correction. [Repealed.]

275.070.
Duty of Secretary of State to file document — Manner of filing — Effect of filing or refusal to file. [Repealed.]

275.075.
Appeal of refusal of Secretary of State to file document. [Repealed.]

275.080.
Effect of certificate of Secretary of State attached to copy of filed document. [Repealed.]

275.085.
Certificate of existence — Certificate of authorization. [Repealed.]

275.090.
Prohibition against knowingly signing false document — Penalty. [Repealed.]

275.095.
Personal liability when acting without authority.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a limited liability company, knowing there has been no organization under this chapter, or who assume to act for a limited liability company without authority to do so, shall be jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
19, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, § 104, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 104, effective July 15, 2010.

275.100.
Name of limited liability company.

The name of each limited liability company shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
20, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
105, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., 2010, ch. 51, §
105, effective July 15, 2010; ch. 133, §
30, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 76, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, both effective 7/15/2010. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together. Effective 1/1/2011, this section was also repealed and reenacted by the omnibus Kentucky Business Entity Filing Act, 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151.

275.105.
Reserved limited liability company name. [Repealed.]

275.110.
Registration of name of foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.115.
Registered office — Registered agent.

Each domestic limited liability company shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth a registered office and a registered agent that comply with KRS

14A.4-010

.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 77, effective January 1, 2011.

275.120.
Change of registered office or registered agent. [Repealed.]

275.125.
Resignation of registered agent. [Repealed.]

275.130.
Service of process. [Repealed.]

275.135.
Members or managers as agents.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every member shall be an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business or affairs, and the act of any member, including but not limited to the execution in the name of the limited liability company of any instrument, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business or affairs of the limited liability company of which he is a member, shall bind the limited liability company, unless the member so acting has, in fact, no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter, and the person with whom the member is dealing has knowledge or has received notification of the fact that the member has no such authority.

If the articles of organization provide that management of the limited liability company is vested in a manager or managers:

No member, solely by reason of being a member, shall be an agent of the limited liability company; and

Every manager shall be an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business or affairs, and the act of any manager, including, but not limited to, the execution in the name of the limited liability company of any instrument, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business or affairs of the limited liability company of which he is the manager shall bind the limited liability company, unless the manager so acting has, in fact, no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter, and the person with whom the manager is dealing has knowledge or has received notification of the fact that the manager has no such authority.

An act of a manager or a member which is apparently not for the carrying on in the usual way of the business or affairs of the limited liability company shall not bind the limited liability company unless, at the time of the transaction or at any other time, the act is authorized in accordance with the operating agreement.

An act of a manager or member in contravention of a restriction on authority shall not bind the limited liability company to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
27, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
25, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
107, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 107, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

275.140.
Effect of statements by members or managers.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an admission, statement, or representation made by any member concerning the business or affairs of a limited liability company within the scope of the member’s authority as provided for by this chapter shall be evidence against the limited liability company.

If the articles of organization provide that management of the limited liability company is vested in a manager or managers:

An admission, statement, or representation made by a manager concerning the business or affairs of a limited liability company within the scope of the manager’s authority as provided for by this chapter shall be evidence against the limited liability company; and

The admission, statement, or representation of any member, acting solely in the capacity of a member, shall not constitute evidence against the limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 28, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.145.
Effect of notice to members or managers.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, notice to any member of any matter relating to the business or affairs of the limited liability company, and the knowledge of the member acting in the particular matter, acquired while a member or known at the time of becoming a member, and the knowledge of any other member who reasonably could and should have communicated the knowledge to the acting member, shall operate as notice to or knowledge of the limited liability company, except in the case of a fraud on the limited liability company committed by or with the consent of that member.

If the articles of organization provide that management of the limited liability company is vested in a manager or managers:

Notice to any manager of any matter relating to the business or affairs of the limited liability company, and the knowledge of the manager acting in the particular matter, acquired while a manager or known at the time of becoming a manager, and the knowledge of any other manager who reasonably could and should have communicated the knowledge to the acting manager, shall operate as notice to or knowledge of the limited liability company, except in the case of a fraud on the limited liability company committed by or with the consent of that manager; and

Notice to or knowledge of any member of the limited liability company while the member is acting solely in the capacity of a member shall not constitute notice to or knowledge of the limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 29, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.150.
Immunity from personal liability.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or as otherwise specifically set forth in other sections in this chapter, no member, manager, employee, or agent of a limited liability company, including a professional limited liability company, shall be personally liable by reason of being a member, manager, employee, or agent of the limited liability company, under a judgment, decree, or order of a court, agency, or tribunal of any type, or in any other manner, in this or any other state, or on any other basis, for a debt, obligation, or liability of the limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise. The status of a person as a member, manager, employee, or agent of a limited liability company, including a professional limited liability company, shall not subject the person to personal liability for the acts or omissions, including any negligence, wrongful act, or actionable misconduct, of any other member, manager, agent, or employee of the limited liability company. That a limited liability company has a single member or a single manager is not a basis for setting aside the rule otherwise recited in this subsection.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, under a written operating agreement or under another written agreement, a member or manager may agree to be obligated personally for any of the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the limited liability company.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not affect the liability of a member, manager, employee, or agent of a limited liability company for his or her own negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 30, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 133, § 31, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 105, effective July 12, 2012.